test/tools/stress.random-lexicons-100.lexc
LEXICON N21
+N21:vflh	Cases ;
+N21:vghh	Cases ;
+N21:vkäg	Cases ;
+N21:vabk	Cases ;
+N21:vzsr	Cases ;
+N21:vdhv	Cases ;
+N21:vövn	Cases ;
+N21:vlkå	Cases ;
+N21:vdgu	Cases ;
+N21:vqwo	Cases ;
+N21:vöqb	Cases ;
+N21:vshi	Cases ;
+N21:vxvö	Cases ;
+N21:vkbs	Cases ;
+N21:vxgå	Cases ;
+N21:vrkt	Cases ;
+N21:vrbö	Cases ;
+N21:voyn	Cases ;
+N21:vönk	Cases ;
+N21:vghp	Cases ;
+N21:vrrp	Cases ;
+N21:vxäi	Cases ;
+N21:vbhg	Cases ;
+N21:väbl	Cases ;
+N21:vvfc	Cases ;
+N21:veuv	Cases ;
+N21:vivb	Cases ;
+N21:vtik	Cases ;
+N21:vuxx	Cases ;
+N21:vmxr	Cases ;
+N21:vrjj	Cases ;
+N21:vjjx	Cases ;
+N21:vnls	Cases ;
+N21:våjq	Cases ;
+N21:vpde	Cases ;
+N21:vzcc	Cases ;
+N21:viur	Cases ;
+N21:vcjc	Cases ;
+N21:vedg	Cases ;
+N21:vvtc	Cases ;
+N21:vslc	Cases ;
+N21:vbem	Cases ;
+N21:vjöx	Cases ;
+N21:vfdc	Cases ;
+N21:vrok	Cases ;
+N21:vjmg	Cases ;
+N21:vrsf	Cases ;
+N21:vtrf	Cases ;
+N21:vöop	Cases ;
+N21:vwlq	Cases ;
+N21:våoe	Cases ;
+N21:vblr	Cases ;
+N21:vcvs	Cases ;
+N21:vbjq	Cases ;
+N21:vubf	Cases ;
+N21:vxvz	Cases ;
+N21:vzek	Cases ;
+N21:vqbc	Cases ;
+N21:vwun	Cases ;
+N21:vövj	Cases ;
+N21:vlbr	Cases ;
+N21:vixc	Cases ;
+N21:vkbg	Cases ;
+N21:vggö	Cases ;
+N21:vqpz	Cases ;
+N21:vfde	Cases ;
+N21:vemn	Cases ;
+N21:vrzx	Cases ;
+N21:vpgf	Cases ;
+N21:vöhq	Cases ;
+N21:vhxg	Cases ;
+N21:våzä	Cases ;
+N21:vbye	Cases ;
+N21:vujg	Cases ;
+N21:vdbr	Cases ;
+N21:vöbö	Cases ;
+N21:vjje	Cases ;
+N21:vgnu	Cases ;
+N21:vöfö	Cases ;
+N21:vvzx	Cases ;
+N21:vfäå	Cases ;
+N21:vcfn	Cases ;
+N21:vmår	Cases ;
+N21:vqåi	Cases ;
+N21:vsop	Cases ;
+N21:väeu	Cases ;
+N21:vdäh	Cases ;
+N21:vvuu	Cases ;
+N21:vvpr	Cases ;
+N21:vpfq	Cases ;
+N21:vänå	Cases ;
+N21:vntl	Cases ;
+N21:vqåw	Cases ;
+N21:våey	Cases ;
+N21:vtee	Cases ;
+N21:våäm	Cases ;
+N21:vrbf	Cases ;
+N21:vqbe	Cases ;
+N21:vxön	Cases ;


LEXICON N22
+N22:wkfv	Cases ;
+N22:wjml	Cases ;
+N22:wäjm	Cases ;
+N22:wöwh	Cases ;
+N22:wksa	Cases ;
+N22:wemf	Cases ;
+N22:wåyz	Cases ;
+N22:wpqk	Cases ;
+N22:wfme	Cases ;
+N22:wbqp	Cases ;
+N22:whxl	Cases ;
+N22:wduy	Cases ;
+N22:wqch	Cases ;
+N22:wvll	Cases ;
+N22:wadc	Cases ;
+N22:wdox	Cases ;
+N22:wäfv	Cases ;
+N22:wöjq	Cases ;
+N22:wxkb	Cases ;
+N22:wgmq	Cases ;
+N22:wdlö	Cases ;
+N22:wtzb	Cases ;
+N22:wgwh	Cases ;
+N22:wäuz	Cases ;
+N22:wnit	Cases ;
+N22:wqsc	Cases ;
+N22:wwys	Cases ;
+N22:wjpb	Cases ;
+N22:wrjä	Cases ;
+N22:wqåo	Cases ;
+N22:wöxs	Cases ;
+N22:wixr	Cases ;
+N22:wöub	Cases ;
+N22:wskc	Cases ;
+N22:wvib	Cases ;
+N22:wåxs	Cases ;
+N22:wnåm	Cases ;
+N22:wfpq	Cases ;
+N22:wmfo	Cases ;
+N22:wqty	Cases ;
+N22:wwnå	Cases ;
+N22:wöso	Cases ;
+N22:wcrb	Cases ;
+N22:wfbo	Cases ;
+N22:wvrs	Cases ;
+N22:wcav	Cases ;
+N22:wlil	Cases ;
+N22:wtjk	Cases ;
+N22:wväw	Cases ;
+N22:wkka	Cases ;
+N22:wgfo	Cases ;
+N22:wmaö	Cases ;
+N22:wuaq	Cases ;
+N22:wäpä	Cases ;
+N22:wnåä	Cases ;
+N22:wldc	Cases ;
+N22:wxyx	Cases ;
+N22:wödf	Cases ;
+N22:wåss	Cases ;
+N22:wjåp	Cases ;
+N22:wpuy	Cases ;
+N22:wäoo	Cases ;
+N22:wnxz	Cases ;
+N22:wkzq	Cases ;
+N22:wjsw	Cases ;
+N22:wsiu	Cases ;
+N22:wjpv	Cases ;
+N22:wåci	Cases ;
+N22:wwwm	Cases ;
+N22:warö	Cases ;
+N22:wpts	Cases ;
+N22:wökv	Cases ;
+N22:wykå	Cases ;
+N22:wttw	Cases ;
+N22:wepe	Cases ;
+N22:wohd	Cases ;
+N22:wåkx	Cases ;
+N22:wyaå	Cases ;
+N22:wwbl	Cases ;
+N22:wkoi	Cases ;
+N22:waiu	Cases ;
+N22:waöa	Cases ;
+N22:wiph	Cases ;
+N22:wejq	Cases ;
+N22:wemb	Cases ;
+N22:wuäx	Cases ;
+N22:wsyj	Cases ;
+N22:wlke	Cases ;
+N22:wlpn	Cases ;
+N22:wävz	Cases ;
+N22:wujn	Cases ;
+N22:wsvj	Cases ;
+N22:wnii	Cases ;
+N22:wxjv	Cases ;
+N22:wqkn	Cases ;
+N22:wgac	Cases ;
+N22:wkea	Cases ;
+N22:wynt	Cases ;
+N22:wäda	Cases ;


LEXICON N23
+N23:xhnk	Cases ;
+N23:xslt	Cases ;
+N23:xecs	Cases ;
+N23:xwåh	Cases ;
+N23:xksl	Cases ;
+N23:xcli	Cases ;
+N23:xtdv	Cases ;
+N23:xöjh	Cases ;
+N23:xrty	Cases ;
+N23:xgaå	Cases ;
+N23:xgöl	Cases ;
+N23:xczg	Cases ;
+N23:xåzh	Cases ;
+N23:xjxm	Cases ;
+N23:xrqx	Cases ;
+N23:xvlw	Cases ;
+N23:xzxr	Cases ;
+N23:xwyk	Cases ;
+N23:xico	Cases ;
+N23:xtca	Cases ;
+N23:xhne	Cases ;
+N23:xgqv	Cases ;
+N23:xjtf	Cases ;
+N23:xjda	Cases ;
+N23:xsbg	Cases ;
+N23:xåmz	Cases ;
+N23:xvfl	Cases ;
+N23:xktj	Cases ;
+N23:xmlx	Cases ;
+N23:xgen	Cases ;
+N23:xmäw	Cases ;
+N23:xådj	Cases ;
+N23:xbkj	Cases ;
+N23:xpsp	Cases ;
+N23:xtåq	Cases ;
+N23:xfmn	Cases ;
+N23:xbyv	Cases ;
+N23:xvår	Cases ;
+N23:xänd	Cases ;
+N23:xzgg	Cases ;
+N23:xqtz	Cases ;
+N23:xöli	Cases ;
+N23:xppk	Cases ;
+N23:xbvj	Cases ;
+N23:xwql	Cases ;
+N23:xnäe	Cases ;
+N23:xsve	Cases ;
+N23:xläi	Cases ;
+N23:xred	Cases ;
+N23:xgov	Cases ;
+N23:xuzi	Cases ;
+N23:xbbl	Cases ;
+N23:xryt	Cases ;
+N23:xiul	Cases ;
+N23:xhfl	Cases ;
+N23:xyfp	Cases ;
+N23:xnrl	Cases ;
+N23:xtak	Cases ;
+N23:xhgä	Cases ;
+N23:xgöm	Cases ;
+N23:xmev	Cases ;
+N23:xxäo	Cases ;
+N23:xxip	Cases ;
+N23:xmmr	Cases ;
+N23:xzza	Cases ;
+N23:xjvx	Cases ;
+N23:xzhf	Cases ;
+N23:xuäa	Cases ;
+N23:xomn	Cases ;
+N23:xmlf	Cases ;
+N23:xipå	Cases ;
+N23:xtså	Cases ;
+N23:xåpö	Cases ;
+N23:xgiw	Cases ;
+N23:xöba	Cases ;
+N23:xytk	Cases ;
+N23:xozg	Cases ;
+N23:xözu	Cases ;
+N23:xhom	Cases ;
+N23:xbna	Cases ;
+N23:xwnc	Cases ;
+N23:xjno	Cases ;
+N23:xsxu	Cases ;
+N23:xmpä	Cases ;
+N23:xvji	Cases ;
+N23:xåmå	Cases ;
+N23:xdgj	Cases ;
+N23:xjöe	Cases ;
+N23:xexc	Cases ;
+N23:xmöx	Cases ;
+N23:xser	Cases ;
+N23:xjäd	Cases ;
+N23:xfpa	Cases ;
+N23:xkcq	Cases ;
+N23:xzlb	Cases ;
+N23:xhmq	Cases ;
+N23:xlak	Cases ;
+N23:xwgj	Cases ;
+N23:xfgd	Cases ;


LEXICON N24
+N24:yxoc	Cases ;
+N24:yiii	Cases ;
+N24:yttj	Cases ;
+N24:ytåå	Cases ;
+N24:yqbk	Cases ;
+N24:ykfq	Cases ;
+N24:ykui	Cases ;
+N24:yvah	Cases ;
+N24:yjyz	Cases ;
+N24:yhkk	Cases ;
+N24:yväb	Cases ;
+N24:ypxq	Cases ;
+N24:yqah	Cases ;
+N24:ywww	Cases ;
+N24:yzaq	Cases ;
+N24:yöeo	Cases ;
+N24:yköb	Cases ;
+N24:ybos	Cases ;
+N24:ygak	Cases ;
+N24:yjen	Cases ;
+N24:yyeo	Cases ;
+N24:yöcs	Cases ;
+N24:ydrv	Cases ;
+N24:yqpf	Cases ;
+N24:yxhf	Cases ;
+N24:yqip	Cases ;
+N24:yqtl	Cases ;
+N24:ygeq	Cases ;
+N24:yhoa	Cases ;
+N24:yhbo	Cases ;
+N24:yanc	Cases ;
+N24:yflu	Cases ;
+N24:yuöi	Cases ;
+N24:yuyg	Cases ;
+N24:yjtd	Cases ;
+N24:yäri	Cases ;
+N24:yzjq	Cases ;
+N24:ypxb	Cases ;
+N24:yhgp	Cases ;
+N24:ymkr	Cases ;
+N24:ydpd	Cases ;
+N24:yypw	Cases ;
+N24:ypcd	Cases ;
+N24:yäuo	Cases ;
+N24:yöwo	Cases ;
+N24:yxqt	Cases ;
+N24:yäxv	Cases ;
+N24:ydrx	Cases ;
+N24:yuåa	Cases ;
+N24:yijb	Cases ;
+N24:yucp	Cases ;
+N24:ymfl	Cases ;
+N24:ywsb	Cases ;
+N24:ythv	Cases ;
+N24:yhve	Cases ;
+N24:yniz	Cases ;
+N24:yhxb	Cases ;
+N24:ygmb	Cases ;
+N24:yöqq	Cases ;
+N24:yipd	Cases ;
+N24:yåjö	Cases ;
+N24:yuhq	Cases ;
+N24:yxkä	Cases ;
+N24:yöqe	Cases ;
+N24:yääk	Cases ;
+N24:yzcq	Cases ;
+N24:ytsk	Cases ;
+N24:ykzw	Cases ;
+N24:yäyj	Cases ;
+N24:yuyä	Cases ;
+N24:ysdw	Cases ;
+N24:ytgt	Cases ;
+N24:ysby	Cases ;
+N24:yåke	Cases ;
+N24:yojv	Cases ;
+N24:yfjt	Cases ;
+N24:yuzö	Cases ;
+N24:yrau	Cases ;
+N24:yfbä	Cases ;
+N24:yåju	Cases ;
+N24:yhtu	Cases ;
+N24:yfäq	Cases ;
+N24:ykyx	Cases ;
+N24:ypje	Cases ;
+N24:yfqv	Cases ;
+N24:yökn	Cases ;
+N24:ylwi	Cases ;
+N24:yrba	Cases ;
+N24:yqds	Cases ;
+N24:yvxv	Cases ;
+N24:yngx	Cases ;
+N24:yqqh	Cases ;
+N24:yidh	Cases ;
+N24:yogw	Cases ;
+N24:yjxj	Cases ;
+N24:ynwh	Cases ;
+N24:yqwp	Cases ;
+N24:ygxh	Cases ;
+N24:yvja	Cases ;

LEXICON Root
u N21 ;
v N22 ;
w N23 ;
x N24 ;
